csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_am.yaml
     waabandan+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamookan
     waabandan+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamookeg
     waabandan+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamookang
     waabandan+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandangen
     waabandan+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandangegon
     waabandan+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Sg: waabandanziidaa
     waabandan+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Pl: waabandanziidaanin
     waabandan+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandan
     waabandan+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [waabandamog,waabandamok]
     waabandan+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Sg: waabandandaa
     waabandan+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Pl: waabandandaanin
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamaan
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandameg
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandaman
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaad
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandaminid
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandang
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamaang
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamang
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: waabandaming
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwaan
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziweg
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwan
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanzigwaa
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanzinig
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanzig
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwaang
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwang
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: [MISSING,waabandanzing]
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamaambaan
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [waabandamegiban,waabandamegoban]
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamamban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaapan
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandaminipan
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandangiban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamaangiban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamangiban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamingiban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwaambaan
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [waabandanziwegiban,waabandanziwegoban]
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwamban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanzigwaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanzinigoban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanzigoban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwaangiban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwangiban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanzingiban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowegwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaagwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandaminigwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamogwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaangen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowangen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowiingen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwaanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwegwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwaagwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziinigwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziigwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwaangen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwangen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwiingen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaambaanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [waabandamowegibanen,waabandamowegobanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowambanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaagobanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandaminigobanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamogobanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaangibanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowangibanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: wabandamowiingibanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwaambaanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [waabandanziiwegibanen,waabandanziiwegobanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwambanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwaagobanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziinigobanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziigobanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwaangibanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwangibanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwiingibanen
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Pl: niwaabandaanan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niwaabandaan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Pl: giwaabandaanaawaan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg: giwaabandaanaawaa
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Pl: giwaabandaanan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: giwaabandaan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Pl: owaabandaanaawaan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg: owaabandaanaawaa
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [owaabandaanan,owaabandamini]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: [owaabandamini,owaabandaanini]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Pl: owaabandaanan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg: owaabandaan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Pl: niwaabandaamin
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg: niwaabandaamin
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Pl: giwaabandaamin
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg: giwaabandaamin
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Pl: niwaabandanziinan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niwaabandanziin
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Pl: giwaabandanziinaawaan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg: giwaabandanziinaawaa
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Pl: giwaabandanziinan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: giwaabandanziin
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Pl: owaabandanziinaawaan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg: owaabandanziinaawaa
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [owaabandanziinan,owaabandanziinini]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: [owaabandanziinini,owaabandanziini]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Pl: owaabandanziinan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg: owaabandanziin
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Pl: niwaabandanziimin
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg: niwaabandanziimin
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Pl: giwaabandanziimin
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg: giwaabandanziimin
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Pl: [niwaabandaanaabaniin,niwaabandaanaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg: niwaabandaanaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Pl: [giwaabandaanaawaabaniin,giwaabandaanaawaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg: giwaabandaanaawaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Pl: [giwaabandaanaabaniin,giwaabandaanaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg: giwaabandaanaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Pl: [owaabandaanaawaabaniin,owaabandaanaawaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg: owaabandaanaawaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [owaabandaaninaabaniin,owaabandaaninaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: owaabandaaninaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Pl: [owaabandaanaabaniin,owaabandaanaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg: owaabandaanaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Pl: [niwaabandaaminaabaniin,niwaabandaaminaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg: niwaabandaaminaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Pl: [giwaabandaaminaabaniin,giwaabandaaminaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg: giwaabandaaminaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Pl: [niwaabandanziinaabaniin,niwaabandanziinaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg: niwaabandanziinaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Pl: [giwaabandanziinaawaabaniin,giwaabandanziinaawaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg: giwaabandanziinaawaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Pl: [giwaabandanziinaabaniin,giwaabandanziinaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg: giwaabandanziinaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Pl: [owaabandanziinaawaabaniin,owaabandanziinaawaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg: owaabandanziinaawaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [owaabandanziininaabaniin,owaabandanziininaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: owaabandanziininaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Pl: [owaabandanziinaabaniin,owaabandanziinaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg: owaabandanziinaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Pl: [niwaabandanziiminaabaniin,niwaabandanziiminaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg: niwaabandanziiminaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Pl: [giwaabandanziiminaabaniin,giwaabandanziiminaabanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg: giwaabandanziiminaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Pl: niwaabandaanaadogenan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg: niwaabandaanaadog
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Pl: giwaabandaanaawaadogenan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg: giwaabandaanaawaadog
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Pl: giwaabandaanaadogenan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg: giwaabandaanaadog
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Pl: owaabandaanaawaadogenan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg: owaabandaanaawaadog
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [owaabandaminaadogenan,owaabandaaninaadogenan]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: [owaabandaminaadog,owaabandaaninaadog]
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Pl: owaabandaanaadogenan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg: owaabandaanaadog
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Pl: niwaabandaaminaadogenan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg: niwaabandaaminaadog
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Pl: giwaabandaaminaadogenan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg: giwaabandaaminaadog
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+0Pl: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg: MISSING
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Pl: niwaabandanziinaadogenan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg: niwaabandanziinaadog
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Pl: giwaabandanziinaawaadogenan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg: giwaabandanziinaawaadog
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Pl: giwaabandanziinaadogenan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg: giwaabandanziinaadog
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Pl: owaabandanziinaawaadogenan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg: owaabandanziinaawaadog
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: owaabandanziininaadogenan
     waabandan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: owaabandanziininaadog
